Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-725
Hunting; privately owned land; posting; written consent; contents.

The operator of property which has been posted as provided in section 37-724 shall have the privilege of permitting or denying hunting on such property, except that when consent for persons other than members of the family is extended, it shall be written consent. Each written permit shall be for such time as the operator shall designate and shall bear the date and the signature of the farm or ranch operator.

Laws 1963, c. 199, § 3, p. 646;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-213.04;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 339.